District of Columbia statutes.
29-414.02

Application to registered foreign corporations.

A foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to do business in the District on the effective date of this chapter shall be subject to this chapter, but is not required to obtain a new certificate of registration to do business under this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(22), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “registered” for “qualified” in the section heading.